Maryland, session 2025, HB0478.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment.
Italics indicate opposite chamber/conference co mm i tte e a m en dm en ts*. hb0478*

HOUSE BILL 478
Article – Education
16–407.1.
(a) There is a Hagerstown Community College Police Force.
(b) (1) A Hagerstown Community College police officer has the powers granted
to a peace and police officer.
(2) (i) [A] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, A Hagerstown Community College police officer may exercise these powers
only on property that is owned, leased, operated by, or under the control of Hagerstown
Community College.
(ii) The police officer may [not] exercise these powers on any other
property [unless] WITHIN WASHINGTON COUNTY IF:
1. Engaged in fresh pursuit of a suspected offender;
2. Necessary to facilitate the orderly flow of traffic to and
from property owned, leased, operated by, or under the control of Hagerstown Community
College; or
3. Ordered to do so by the Governor; OR
4. IN WASHINGTON COUNTY WHEN:
A. RESPONDING TO AN IMMINENT THREAT TO LIFE,
PROPERTY, OR PUBLIC SAFETY; OR
B. COMPLYING WITH A MEMORANDUM OF
UNDERSTANDING BETWEEN THE HAGERSTOWN COMMUNITY COLLEGE POLICE
FORCE AND ANOTHER LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY WITH JURISDICTION.
(c) (1) In consultation with the Secretary of State Police and the Maryland
Police Training and Standards Commission, the Hagerstown Community College Board of
Trustees shall adopt standards, qualifications, and prerequisites of character, training,
education, human and public relations, and experience for Hagerstown Community College
police officers, including standards for the performance of their duties.
(2) To the extent practicable, the Board shall adopt standards that are
similar to the standards adopted for the Department of State Police.

HOUSE BILL 478 3
(d) The Hagerstown Community College Board of Trustees shall adopt
regulations governing the operation and conduct of the Hagerstown Community College
Police Force and of Hagerstown Community College police officers.
(E) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION MAY BE CONSTRUED TO:
(1) SUPERSEDE THE AUTHORITY OR JURISDICTION OF:
(I) THE WASHINGTON COUNTY SHERRIFF’S OFFICE; OR
(II) ANY OTHER LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY, AS DEFINED IN §
1–101(C) OF THE PUBLIC SAFETY ARTICLE; OR
(2) LIMIT THE AUTHORITY OR JURISDICTION OF THE HAGERSTOWN
COMMUNITY COLLEGE POLICE FORCE AUTHORIZED UNDER § 5–802 OF THE
CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.